Nebraska, session 109, LB699.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-6831, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6831 (1) A taxpayer shall be entitled to the sales and use tax
incentives contained in subsection (2) of this section if the taxpayer:
(a) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at
least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period;
(b) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at
least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least two hundred
fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations before the end
of the ramp-up period; or
(c) Attains a cumulative investment in qualified property of at
least fifty million dollars at the qualified location or locations before
the end of the ramp-up period. To receive incentives under this
subdivision, the taxpayer must meet the following conditions:
(i) The average compensation of the taxpayer's employees at the
qualified location or locations for each year of the performance period
must equal at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide
average hourly wage for the year of application;
(ii) The taxpayer must offer to its employees who constitute full-
time employees as defined and described in section 4980H of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such section,
at the qualified location or locations for each year of the performance
period, the opportunity to enroll in minimum essential coverage under an
eligible employer-sponsored plan, as those terms are defined and
described in section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, and the regulations for such section; and
(iii) The taxpayer must offer a sufficient package of benefits as
described in subdivision (1)(j) of section 77-6828.
(2) A taxpayer meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall be entitled to the following sales and use tax incentives:
-2-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
(a) A refund of all sales and use taxes paid under the Local Option
Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment
Payment Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 from the date of
the complete application through the meeting of the required levels of
employment and investment for all purchases, including rentals, of:
(i) Qualified property used at the qualified location or locations;
(ii) Property, excluding motor vehicles, based in this state and
used in both this state and another state in connection with the
qualified location or locations except when any such property is to be
used for fundraising for or for the transportation of an elected
official;
(iii) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson
after appointment as a purchasing agent of the owner of the improvement
to real estate when such property is incorporated into real estate at the
qualified location or locations. The refund shall be based on fifty
percent of the contract price, excluding any land, as the cost of
materials subject to the sales and use tax;
(iv) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson
after appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such
property is annexed to, but not incorporated into, real estate at the
qualified location or locations. The refund shall be based on the cost of
materials subject to the sales and use tax that were annexed to real
estate; and
(v) Tangible personal property by a contractor or repairperson after
appointment as a purchasing agent of the taxpayer when such property is
both (A) incorporated into real estate at the qualified location or
locations and (B) annexed to, but not incorporated into, real estate at
the qualified location or locations. The refund shall be based on fifty
percent of the contract price, excluding any land, as the cost of
materials subject to the sales and use tax; and
(b) An exemption from all sales and use taxes under the Local Option
-3-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment
Payment Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 on the types of
purchases, including rentals, listed in subdivision (a) of this
subsection for such purchases, including rentals, occurring during each
year of the performance period in which the taxpayer is at or above the
required levels of employment and investment, except that the exemption
shall be for the actual materials purchased with respect to subdivisions
(2)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this section. To the extent a contractor
purchasing materials pursuant to subdivisions (2)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v)
of this section has made an election to be taxed as a consumer of
building materials under subdivision (2) or (3) of section 77-2701.10 and
has already paid sales tax or remitted use tax on such property, then
such contractor shall certify the amount paid to the taxpayer, and the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a refund of such taxes as if such taxes
were incurred by the taxpayer. To the extent a contractor purchasing
materials pursuant to subdivisions (2)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this
section has made an election to be taxed as the consumer of building
materials under subdivision (2) or (3) of section 77-2701.10 and has not
paid sales tax or remitted use tax, then such contractor's purchases
shall be exempt from such taxes as if such purchases were made by the
taxpayer. The Tax Commissioner shall issue such rules, regulations,
certificates, and forms as are appropriate to implement the efficient use
of this exemption.
(3)(a) Upon execution of the agreement, the taxpayer shall be issued
a direct payment permit under section 77-2705.01, notwithstanding the
three million dollars in purchases limitation in subsection (1) of
section 77-2705.01, for each qualified location specified in the
agreement, unless the taxpayer has opted out of this requirement in the
agreement. For any taxpayer who is issued a direct payment permit, until
such taxpayer makes the investment in qualified property and hires the
new employees at the qualified location or locations as specified in
-4-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
subsection (1) of this section, the taxpayer must pay and remit any
applicable sales and use taxes as required by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) If the taxpayer makes the investment in qualified property and
hires the new employees at the qualified location or locations as
specified in subsection (1) of this section, the taxpayer shall receive
the sales tax refunds described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
For any year in which the taxpayer is not at the required levels of
employment and investment, the taxpayer shall report all sales and use
taxes owed for the period on the taxpayer's tax return.
(4) The taxpayer shall be entitled to one of the following credits
for payment of wages to new employees:
(a)(i) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid to any one
employee during the year shall be excluded from the calculations under
this subdivision;
(ii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location in a county in Nebraska with a population of one
hundred thousand or greater, and at which the majority of the business
activities conducted are described in subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of
section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid to any one
employee during the year shall be excluded from the calculations under
this subdivision; or
-5-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
(iii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location or locations within one or more counties in Nebraska
that each have a population of less than one hundred thousand, and at
which the majority of the business activities conducted are described in
subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be
entitled to a credit equal to six percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees. For purposes of meeting the
ten-employee requirement of this subdivision, the number of new employees
shall be multiplied by two. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid
to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from the
calculations under this subdivision;
(b) If a taxpayer hires at least twenty new employees at the
qualified location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period, the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to five percent times the
average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the
average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred percent of
the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of application.
The credit shall equal seven percent times the average wage of new
employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of the
new employees equals at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. The credit
shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new employees times
the number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees
equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million
dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from
the calculations under this subdivision;
(c) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
-6-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
property of at least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to five
percent times the average wage of new employees times the number of new
employees if the average wage of the new employees equals at least one
hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the
year of application. The credit shall equal seven percent times the
average wage of new employees times the number of new employees if the
average wage of the new employees equals at least one hundred fifty
percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for the year of
application. The credit shall equal nine percent times the average wage
of new employees times the number of new employees if the average wage of
the new employees equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in
excess of one million dollars paid to any one employee during the year
shall be excluded from the calculations under this subdivision;
(d) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least
two hundred fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations
before the end of the ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a
credit equal to seven percent times the average wage of new employees
times the number of new employees if the average wage of the new
employees equals at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska
statewide average hourly wage for the year of application. The credit
shall equal nine percent times the average wage of new employees times
the number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees
equals at least two hundred percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million
dollars paid to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from
the calculations under this subdivision; or
(e) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
-7-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
property of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one
million dollars and hires at least five new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and the number
of new employees and investment are at a qualified location within an
economic redevelopment area, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to six percent times the average wage of new employees times the
number of new employees if the average wage of the new employees equals
at least seventy percent of the Nebraska statewide average hourly wage
for the year of application. Wages in excess of one million dollars paid
to any one employee during the year shall be excluded from the
calculations under this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision,
economic redevelopment area means an area in which (i) the average rate
of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent
federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is
at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period and (ii) the average poverty rate in the
area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or tracts
or federal census block group or block groups in the area.
(5) The taxpayer shall be entitled to one of the following credits
for new investment:
(a)(i) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations;
(ii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location in a county in Nebraska with a population of one
-8-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
hundred thousand or greater, and at which the majority of the business
activities conducted are described in subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of
section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to four
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations unless the cumulative investment exceeds ten
million dollars, in which case the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to seven percent of the investment made in qualified property at
the qualified location or locations; or
(iii) If the taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least one million dollars and hires at least ten new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period and the number of new employees and investment are at a
qualified location or locations within one or more counties in Nebraska
that each have a population of less than one hundred thousand, and at
which the majority of the business activities conducted are described in
subdivision (1)(a) or (1)(n) of section 77-6818, the taxpayer shall be
entitled to a credit equal to four percent of the investment made in
qualified property at the qualified location or locations unless the
cumulative investment exceeds ten million dollars, in which case the
taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven percent of the
investment made in qualified property at the qualified location or
locations. For purposes of meeting the ten-employee requirement of this
subdivision, the number of new employees shall be multiplied by two;
(b) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least five million dollars and hires at least thirty new
employees at the qualified location or locations before the end of the
ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit equal to seven
percent of the investment made in qualified property at the qualified
location or locations;
(c) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty million dollars and hires at least
-9-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
two hundred fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations
before the end of the ramp-up period, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a
credit equal to seven percent of the investment made in qualified
property at the qualified location or locations; or
(d) If a taxpayer attains a cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than one
million dollars and hires at least five new employees at the qualified
location or locations before the end of the ramp-up period and the number
of new employees and investment are at a qualified location within an
economic redevelopment area, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit
equal to four percent of the investment made in qualified property at the
qualified location or locations. For purposes of this subdivision,
economic redevelopment area means an area in which (i) the average rate
of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent
federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is
at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period and (ii) the average poverty rate in the
area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or tracts
or federal census block group or block groups in the area.
(6)(a) The credit percentages prescribed in subdivisions (4)(a),
(b), (c), and (d) and subdivisions (5)(a), (b), and (c) of this section
shall be increased by one percentage point for wages paid and investments
made at qualified locations in an extremely blighted area. For purposes
of this subdivision, extremely blighted area means an area which, before
the end of the ramp-up period, has been declared an extremely blighted
area under section 18-2101.02.
(b) The credit percentages prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section shall be increased by one percentage point if the taxpayer:
(i) Is a benefit corporation as defined in section 21-403 and has
been such a corporation for at least one year prior to submitting an
application under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act; and
-10-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
(ii) Remains a benefit corporation as defined in section 21-403 for
the duration of the taxpayer's agreement under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.
(c) A taxpayer may, if qualified, receive one or both of the
increases provided in this subsection.
(7)(a) The credits prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section shall be allowable for wages paid and investments made during
each year of the performance period that the taxpayer is at or above the
required levels of employment and investment.
(b) The credits prescribed in subsection (5) of this section shall
also be allowable during the first year of the performance period for
investment in qualified property at the qualified location or locations
after the date of the complete application and before the beginning of
the performance period.
(8)(a) Property described in subdivision (8)(c) of this section used
at the qualified location or locations, whether purchased or leased, and
placed in service by the taxpayer after the date of the complete
application, shall constitute separate classes of property and are
eligible for exemption under the conditions and for the time periods
provided in subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
(b) A taxpayer shall receive the exemption of property in
subdivision (8)(c) of this section if the taxpayer attains one of the
following employment and investment levels: (i) Cumulative investment in
qualified property of at least five million dollars and the hiring of at
least thirty new employees at the qualified location or locations before
the end of the ramp-up period; (ii) cumulative investment in qualified
property of at least fifty million dollars at the qualified location or
locations before the end of the ramp-up period, provided the average
compensation of the taxpayer's employees at the qualified location or
locations for the year in which such investment level was attained equals
at least one hundred fifty percent of the Nebraska statewide average
hourly wage for the year of application and the taxpayer offers to its
-11-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
employees who constitute full-time employees as defined and described in
section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the
regulations for such section, at the qualified location or locations for
the year in which such investment level was attained, the opportunity to
enroll in minimum essential coverage under an eligible employer-sponsored
plan, as those terms are defined and described in section 5000A of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations for such
section; or (iii) cumulative investment in qualified property of at least
two hundred fifty million dollars and the hiring of at least two hundred
fifty new employees at the qualified location or locations before the end
of the ramp-up period. Such property shall be eligible for the exemption
from the first January 1 following the end of the year during which the
required levels were exceeded through the ninth December 31 after the
first year property included in subdivision (8)(c) of this section
qualifies for the exemption, except that for a taxpayer who has filed an
application under NAICS code 518210 for Data Processing, Hosting, and
Related Services and who files a separate sequential application for the
same NAICS code for which the ramp-up period begins with the year
immediately after the end of the previous project's performance period or
a taxpayer who has a project qualifying under subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of
section 77-5725 and who files a separate sequential application for NAICS
code 518210 for Data Processing, Hosting, and Related Services for which
the ramp-up period begins with the year immediately after the end of the
previous project's entitlement period, such property described in
subdivision (8)(c)(i) of this section shall be eligible for the exemption
from the first January 1 following the placement in service of such
property through the ninth December 31 after the year the first claim for
exemption is approved.
(c) The following personal property used at the qualified location
or locations, whether purchased or leased, and placed in service by the
taxpayer after the date of the complete application shall constitute
-12-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
separate classes of personal property:
(i) All personal property that constitutes a data center if the
taxpayer qualifies under subdivision (8)(b)(i) or (8)(b)(ii) of this
section;
(ii) Business equipment that is located at a qualified location or
locations and that is involved directly in the manufacture or processing
of agricultural products, including business equipment used primarily for
the capture and compression of carbon dioxide, the manufacturing of
liquid fertilizer or any other chemical applied to agricultural crops, or
the manufacturing of any liquid additive for a farm vehicle fuel if the
taxpayer qualifies under subdivision (8)(b)(i) or (8)(b)(ii) of this
section; or
(iii) All personal property if the taxpayer qualifies under
subdivision (8)(b)(iii) of this section.
(d) In order to receive the property tax exemptions allowed by
subdivision (8)(c) of this section, the taxpayer shall annually file a
claim for exemption with the Tax Commissioner on or before May 1. The
form and supporting schedules shall be prescribed by the Tax Commissioner
and shall list all property for which exemption is being sought under
this section. A separate claim for exemption must be filed for each
agreement and each county in which property is claimed to be exempt. A
copy of this form must also be filed with the county assessor in each
county in which the applicant is requesting exemption. The Tax
Commissioner shall determine whether a taxpayer is eligible to obtain
exemption for personal property based on the criteria for exemption and
the eligibility of each item listed for exemption and, on or before
August 1, certify such determination to the taxpayer and to the affected
county assessor.
(9) The taxpayer shall, on or before the receipt or use of any
incentives under this section, pay to the director a fee of one-half
percent of such incentives, except for the exemption on personal
-13-

LB699 LB699
2025 2025
property, for administering the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, except that the fee
on any sales tax exemption may be paid by the taxpayer with the filing of
its sales and use tax return. Such fee may be paid by direct payment to
the director or through withholding of available refunds. A credit shall
be allowed against such fee for the amount of the fee paid with the
application. All fees collected under this subsection shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the ImagiNE Nebraska Cash Fund,
which fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of fees credited
under this subsection and any other money appropriated to the fund by the
Legislature. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Economic
Development and shall be used for administration of the ImagiNE Nebraska
Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-6831, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-14-